Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4303.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 1. In recognition of Chaldean, Assyrian, and Syriac Americans, who have made significant and valuable contributions to this state and the United States, the legislature declares that the month of May of each year shall be known as "Chaldean American Month". This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor